Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1627
Venue.

The district court or county court of the county in which the violation occurs or in which the person required to pay the fee under section 66-1621 resides shall have jurisdiction to enjoin violations of the Propane Education and Research Act or the rules and regulations provided for under the act, as well as jurisdiction for civil actions to recover fees due, plus interest and costs. If neither of the jurisdictional considerations in this section applies, the district court of Lancaster County shall have jurisdiction.

Laws 1998, LB 699, § 27.